Hawaii, session 2026, SB3253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that numerous species in the State are on the brink of extinction, in particular many indigenous birds found nowhere else in the world. While the State has made progress in addressing the myriad causes contributing to extinction, the legislature finds that existing efforts must be supplemented to prevent further loss of biodiversity. The legislature recognizes that Zealandia (Te Mara a Tane) is a pioneering conservation sanctuary in Wellington, New Zealand, best known for proving how dramatically nature can rebound with proper protection.  Built as a fully fenced, predator-excluded sanctuary, Zealandia creates a safe haven where native birds, reptiles, and plants thrive and recover in near-natural habitats, safe from invasive predators and vectors.  This model has not only enabled the reintroduction and rapid growth of iconic native species that were once on the brink of extinction, but it has also transformed the valley into a living example of ecosystem restoration in a modern city. Just as importantly, Zealandia's impact extends beyond its fence line:  thriving populations disperse outward into surrounding neighborhoods and green spaces, helping native wildlife return to the wider region.  Zealandia also facilitates community engagement by welcoming volunteers, residents, researchers, and visitors, and serving as a hub for school programs and hands-on learning.  Its success in engaging the community and visitors has helped Zealandia become largely self‑funded through admissions, memberships, tours, and experiences that reinvest directly into conservation. The legislature also recognizes that successful sanctuary models in the United States generate substantial revenue for conservation efforts.  They serve as educational centers for local schools and visitor destinations and provide critical habitats for endangered and other species.  The State's climate and environment provide more diverse habitats for wildlife than found elsewhere in the continental United States.  With appropriate considerations and protections to ensure no adverse impact on the state environment, the State can improve the living conditions of rescued animals from other states and generate significant revenue for state conservation efforts. The legislature believes that the State is uniquely positioned to become a national center for endangered species research, education, and protection.  Establishing sanctuaries in the State like those that have proven successful elsewhere can advance the State's position as the premier place for endangered species work and conservation and create pathways for local education, jobs, investment, and research. The legislature also believes that successful nonprofit models for the establishment and operation of specialized models of endangered species sanctuaries are an efficient and preferable way to supplement broader government-run efforts and programs.  The nonprofit models provide more flexibility and adaptability for management, operations, innovation, and community engagement. The legislature further finds that the establishment of a nonprofit entity to create and manage endangered species sanctuaries and exempting appropriations of state funds to the entity from the requirements of chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, complies with the public purpose requirements of article VII, section 4, of the Hawaii State Constitution. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to enable additional support for the State's conservation efforts through recognizing a nonprofit entity established pursuant to senate resolution 94, senate draft 1, regular session of 2026, to create and manage endangered species sanctuaries. SECTION 2.  Chapter 195D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§195D-     Hawaii conservation sanctuary.  (a) There shall be recognized by the State the Hawaii conservation sanctuary, which shall be a nonprofit organization established pursuant to senate resolution 94, senate draft 1, regular session of 2026, to enhance and support the work of conservation and endangered species and wildlife preservation, and to oversee related and ancillary programs.  The official designation of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary shall be the State of Hawaii Conservation Sanctuary. (b)  The Hawaii conservation sanctuary shall protect and expand populations of endangered species and other wildlife within the State by developing and operating conservation sanctuaries in the State, including: (1)  One around a recreational body of water; (2)  One in an area appropriate for the protection of native birds and other species; and (3)  One in an area appropriate for the protection of rescue animals and larger species of wildlife. (c)  The Hawaii conservation sanctuary may: (1)  Operate for-profit business enterprises; (2)  Hold or lease property; (3)  Enter into contracts to support its mission; and (4)  Provide for on-site visitor access and accommodation as it deems appropriate to support its mission. (d)  The Hawaii conservation sanctuary may operate within an agricultural district.  The operations of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary authorized pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) shall be deemed permissible uses pursuant to sections 205-2(d) and 205-4.5. (e)  The qualifying standards and conditions related to the receipt of funds contained in chapter 42F shall not apply to state funds received by the Hawaii conservation sanctuary; provided that if the Hawaii conservation sanctuary in turn contracts with a recipient or provider, then the qualifying standards, conditions, and other provisions of chapter 42F shall apply to the recipient or provider and the contract. (f)  Two seats on the governing board of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary shall be reserved for representatives of the State. (g)  The department shall assist the Hawaii conservation sanctuary with identifying and accessing appropriate land to support its mission." SECTION 3.  Section 205-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  Agricultural districts shall include: (1)  Activities or uses as characterized by the cultivation of crops, crops for bioenergy, orchards, forage, and forestry; (2)  Farming activities or uses related to animal husbandry and game and fish propagation; (3)  Aquaculture, which means the production of aquatic plant and animal life within ponds and other bodies of water; (4)  Wind-generated energy production for public, private, and commercial use; (5)  Biofuel production, as described in section 205‑4.5(a)(16), for public, private, and commercial use; (6)  Solar energy facilities; provided that: (A)  This paragraph shall apply only to land with soil classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating class B, C, D, or E; and (B)  Solar energy facilities placed within land with soil classified as overall productivity rating class B or C shall not occupy more than ten per cent of the acreage of the parcel, or twenty acres of land, whichever is lesser, unless a special use permit is granted pursuant to section 205-6; (7)  Bona fide agricultural services and uses that support the agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold owner of the property and accessory to any of the above activities, regardless of whether conducted on the same premises as the agricultural activities to which they are accessory, including farm dwellings as defined in section 205-4.5(a)(4), employee housing, farm buildings, mills, storage facilities, processing facilities, photovoltaic, biogas, and other small‑scale renewable energy systems producing energy solely for use in the agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold owner of the property, agricultural‑energy facilities as defined in section 205-4.5(a)(17), vehicle and equipment storage areas, and plantation community subdivisions as defined in section 205‑4.5(a)(12); (8)  Wind machines and wind farms; (9)  Small-scale meteorological, air quality, noise, and other scientific and environmental data collection and monitoring facilities occupying less than one-half acre of land; provided that these facilities shall not be used as or equipped for use as living quarters or dwellings; (10)  Agricultural parks; (11)  Agricultural tourism conducted on a working farm, or a farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors; provided that the agricultural tourism activity is accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural use and does not interfere with surrounding farm operations; provided further that this paragraph shall apply only to a county that has adopted ordinances regulating agricultural tourism under section 205-5; (12)  Agricultural tourism activities, including overnight accommodations of twenty-one days or less, for any one stay within a county; provided that this paragraph shall apply only to a county that includes at least three islands and has adopted ordinances regulating agricultural tourism activities pursuant to section 205-5; provided further that the agricultural tourism activities coexist with a bona fide agricultural activity.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "bona fide agricultural activity" means a farming operation as defined in section 165-2; (13)   Open area recreational facilities; (14)   Geothermal resources exploration and geothermal resources development, as defined under section 182-1; (15)   Agricultural-based commercial operations registered in Hawaii, including: (A)  A roadside stand that is not an enclosed structure, owned and operated by a producer for the display and sale of agricultural products grown in Hawaii and value-added products that were produced using agricultural products grown in Hawaii; (B)  Retail activities in an enclosed structure owned and operated by a producer for the display and sale of agricultural products grown in Hawaii, value-added products that were produced using agricultural products grown in Hawaii, logo items related to the producer's agricultural operations, and other food items; (C)  A retail food establishment owned and operated by a producer and permitted under chapter 11-50, Hawaii administrative rules, that prepares and serves food at retail using products grown in Hawaii and value-added products that were produced using agricultural products grown in Hawaii; (D)  A farmers' market, which is an outdoor market limited to producers selling agricultural products grown in Hawaii and value-added products that were produced using agricultural products grown in Hawaii; and (E)  A food hub, which is a facility that may contain a commercial kitchen and provides for the storage, processing, distribution, and sale of agricultural products grown in Hawaii and value-added products that were produced using agricultural products grown in Hawaii. The owner of an agricultural-based commercial operation shall certify, upon request of an officer or agent charged with enforcement of this chapter under section 205-12, that the agricultural products displayed or sold by the operation meet the requirements of this paragraph; (16)   Hydroelectric facilities as described in section 205‑4.5(a)(23); [and] (17)   Composting and co-composting operations; provided that operations that process their own green waste and do not require permits from the department of health shall use the finished composting product only on the operation's own premises to minimize the potential spread of invasive species[.]; and (18)   Operations of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary authorized pursuant to section 195D-   . Agricultural districts shall not include golf courses and golf driving ranges, except as provided in section 205-4.5(d).  No landfill unit, as defined in section 342H-52, shall be located on land within the agricultural district that has soil classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A in a county with a population greater than five hundred thousand.  Agricultural districts include areas that are not used for, or that are not suited to, agricultural and ancillary activities by reason of topography, soils, and other related characteristics." SECTION 4.  Section 205-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Within the agricultural district, all lands with soil classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A or B and for solar energy facilities, class B or C, shall be restricted to the following permitted uses: (1)  Cultivation of crops, including crops for bioenergy, flowers, vegetables, foliage, fruits, forage, and timber; (2)  Game and fish propagation; (3)  Raising of livestock, including poultry, bees, fish, or other animal or aquatic life that are propagated for economic or personal use; (4)  Farm dwellings, employee housing, farm buildings, or activities or uses related to farming and animal husbandry.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "farm dwelling" means a single-family dwelling located on and accessory to a farm, including clusters of single‑family farm dwellings permitted within agricultural parks developed by the State, or where agricultural activity provides income to the family occupying the dwelling; (5)  Public institutions and buildings that are necessary for agricultural practices; (6)  Public and private open area types of recreational uses, including day camps, picnic grounds, parks, and riding stables, but not including dragstrips, airports, drive-in theaters, golf courses, golf driving ranges, country clubs, and overnight camps; provided that overnight camps in operation before January 1, 1961, may be approved by special permit; (7)  Public, private, and quasi-public utility lines and roadways, transformer stations, communications equipment buildings, solid waste transfer stations, major water storage tanks, and appurtenant small buildings such as booster pumping stations, but not including offices or yards for equipment, material, vehicle storage, repair or maintenance, treatment plants, corporation yards, or other similar structures; (8)  Retention, restoration, rehabilitation, or improvement of buildings or sites of historic or scenic interest; (9)  Agricultural-based commercial operations as described in section 205-2(d)(15); (10)  Buildings and uses, including mills, storage, and processing facilities, maintenance facilities, photovoltaic, biogas, and other small-scale renewable energy systems producing energy solely for use in the agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold owner of the property, and vehicle and equipment storage areas that are normally considered directly accessory to the above-mentioned uses and are permitted under section 205-2(d); (11)  Agricultural parks; (12)  Plantation community subdivisions, which as used in this chapter means an established subdivision or cluster of employee housing, community buildings, and agricultural support buildings on land currently or formerly owned, leased, or operated by a sugar or pineapple plantation; provided that the existing structures may be used or rehabilitated for use, and new employee housing and agricultural support buildings may be allowed on land within the subdivision as follows: (A)  The employee housing is occupied by employees or former employees of the plantation who have a property interest in the land; (B)  The employee housing units not owned by their occupants shall be rented or leased at affordable rates for agricultural workers; or (C)  The agricultural support buildings shall be rented or leased to agricultural business operators or agricultural support services; (13)  Agricultural tourism conducted on a working farm, or a farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors; provided that the agricultural tourism activity is accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural use and does not interfere with surrounding farm operations; provided further that this paragraph shall apply only to a county that has adopted ordinances regulating agricultural tourism under section 205-5; (14)  Agricultural tourism activities, including overnight accommodations of twenty-one days or less, for any one stay within a county; provided that this paragraph shall apply only to a county that includes at least three islands and has adopted ordinances regulating agricultural tourism activities pursuant to section 205-5; provided further that the agricultural tourism activities coexist with a bona fide agricultural activity.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "bona fide agricultural activity" means a farming operation as defined in section 165-2; (15)  Wind energy facilities, including the appurtenances associated with the production and transmission of wind generated energy; provided that the wind energy facilities and appurtenances are compatible with agriculture uses and cause minimal adverse impact on agricultural land; (16)  Biofuel processing facilities, including the appurtenances associated with the production and refining of biofuels that is normally considered directly accessory and secondary to the growing of the energy feedstock; provided that biofuel processing facilities and appurtenances do not adversely impact agricultural land and other agricultural uses in the vicinity. For the purposes of this paragraph: "Appurtenances" means operational infrastructure of the appropriate type and scale for economic commercial storage and distribution, and other similar handling of feedstock, fuels, and other products of biofuel processing facilities. "Biofuel processing facility" means a facility that produces liquid or gaseous fuels from organic sources such as biomass crops, agricultural residues, and oil crops, including palm, canola, soybean, and waste cooking oils; grease; food wastes; and animal residues and wastes that can be used to generate energy; (17)  Agricultural-energy facilities, including appurtenances necessary for an agricultural-energy enterprise; provided that the primary activity of the agricultural-energy enterprise is agricultural activity.  To be considered the primary activity of an agricultural-energy enterprise, the total acreage devoted to agricultural activity shall be no less than ninety per cent of the total acreage of the agricultural-energy enterprise.  The agricultural-energy facility shall be limited to lands owned, leased, licensed, or operated by the entity conducting the agricultural activity. As used in this paragraph: "Agricultural activity" means any activity described in paragraphs (1) to (3) of this subsection. "Agricultural-energy enterprise" means an enterprise that integrally incorporates an agricultural activity with an agricultural-energy facility. "Agricultural-energy facility" means a facility that generates, stores, or distributes renewable energy as defined in section 269-91 or renewable fuel including electrical or thermal energy or liquid or gaseous fuels from products of agricultural activities from agricultural lands located in the State. "Appurtenances" means operational infrastructure of the appropriate type and scale for the economic commercial generation, storage, distribution, and other similar handling of energy, including equipment, feedstock, fuels, and other products of agricultural-energy facilities; (18)  Construction and operation of wireless communication antennas, including small wireless facilities; provided that, for the purposes of this paragraph, "wireless communication antenna" means communications equipment that is either freestanding or placed upon or attached to an already existing structure and that transmits and receives electromagnetic radio signals used in the provision of all types of wireless communications services; provided further that "small wireless facilities" shall have the same meaning as in section 206N-2; provided further that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to permit the construction of any new structure that is not deemed a permitted use under this subsection; (19)  Agricultural education programs conducted on a farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the education and participation of the general public; provided that the agricultural education programs are accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural use of the parcels or lots on which the agricultural education programs are to occur and do not interfere with surrounding farm operations.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "agricultural education programs" means activities or events designed to promote knowledge and understanding of agricultural activities and practices conducted on a farming operation as defined in section 165-2; (20)  Solar energy facilities that do not occupy more than ten per cent of the acreage of the parcel, or twenty acres of land, whichever is lesser or for which a special use permit is granted pursuant to section 205‑6; provided that this use shall not be permitted on lands with soil classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A; (21)  Solar energy facilities on lands with soil classified by the land study bureau's detailed land classification as overall (master) productivity rating B or C for which a special use permit is granted pursuant to section 205-6; provided that: (A)  The area occupied by the solar energy facilities is also made available for compatible agricultural activities at a lease rate that is at least fifty per cent below the fair market rent for comparable properties; (B)  Proof of financial security to decommission the facility is provided to the satisfaction of the appropriate county planning commission before the date of commencement of commercial generation; and (C)  Solar energy facilities shall be decommissioned at the owner's expense according to the following requirements: (i)  Removal of all equipment related to the solar energy facility within twelve months of the conclusion of operation or useful life; and (ii)  Restoration of the disturbed earth to substantially the same physical condition as existed before the development of the solar energy facility. For the purposes of this paragraph, "agricultural activities" means the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (3); (22)  Geothermal resources exploration and geothermal resources development, as defined under section 182-1; (23)  Hydroelectric facilities, including the appurtenances associated with the production and transmission of hydroelectric energy, subject to section 205-2; provided that the hydroelectric facilities and their appurtenances: (A)  Shall consist of a small hydropower facility as defined by the United States Department of Energy, including: (i)  Impoundment facilities using a dam to store water in a reservoir; (ii)  A diversion or run-of-river facility that channels a portion of a river through a canal or channel; and (iii)  Pumped storage facilities that store energy by pumping water uphill to a reservoir at higher elevation from a reservoir at a lower elevation to be released to turn a turbine to generate electricity; (B)  Comply with the state water code, chapter 174C; (C)  Shall, if over five hundred kilowatts in hydroelectric generating capacity, have the approval of the commission on water resource management, including a new instream flow standard established for any new hydroelectric facility; and (D)  Do not impact or impede the use of agricultural land or the availability of surface or ground water for all uses on all parcels that are served by the ground water sources or streams for which hydroelectric facilities are considered; [or] (24)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, composting and co-composting operations; provided that operations that process their own green waste and do not require permits from the department of health shall use the finished composting product only on the operation's own premises to minimize the potential spread of invasive species[.]; or (25)  Operations of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary authorized pursuant to section 195D-   ." SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect upon July 1, 2026.